Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4900.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 16431. (1) Notwithstanding the requirements of part 161, the board may require a licensee seeking renewal of a license to furnish the board with satisfactory evidence that during the 2 years immediately preceding the application for renewal the applicant has attended not less than two 2, 2-day educational conferences approved by the board, in subjects related to the practice of chiropractic and designed to further educate licensees. (2) As required under section 16204, the department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the educational conferences required under subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses in pain and symptom management. (3) The department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules requiring each applicant for license renewal to complete as part of the educational conferences required under subsection (1) an appropriate number of hours or courses concerning the provisions of section 16401(1) that were added by the amendatory act that added this subsection.2009 PA 221. (4) Beginning on a date determined appropriate by the board, the board shall consider the completion of courses or programs offered through the Providers of Approved Continuing Education of the Federation of Chiropractic Licensing Board, or equivalent courses or programs as determined by the board, as meeting the requirements described in subsection (1). The board shall establish by rule the number of courses or programs that the board considers equivalent to attending a conference described in subsection (1).